South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3247.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Excused school absences, limits, missed assignments SECTION 1.    Article 5, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-462.    Each school district shall adopt a policy that authorizes a student to be excused from school absences, not to exceed ten school days per school year, to participate in a Career and Technical Student Organization experience in which student participation and learning outcomes are directed by a certified teacher for assessment of competencies. Participation in such Career and Technical Student Organization experience may include, but is not limited to, scheduled events of state-level Future Farmers of America (FFA) organizations, the national FFA organization, and 4-H programs as part of organized competitions or exhibitions. The student and his parent or legal guardian are responsible for obtaining and completing assignments missed while the student participates in any such Career and Technical Student Organization experiences. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________